fi: Satulan pehmustetyyli: Yleiskäyttöinen; Bareback; Tynnyriratsastus; Korjaava; Kouluratsastus; Matkaratsastus; Askellajihevonen; Puolihuopa; Esteratsastus / close contact; Poolo; Satulaviltti; Istuinpehmuste; Näyttely; Terapeuttinen; Lännenratsastus; Muu
zh-TW: 鞍墊樣式: 綜合; 裸背騎乘; 繞桶賽; 矯正型; 馬場馬術; 耐力賽; 步調馬; 半墊; 障礙超越 / 貼身; 馬球; 鞍毯; 坐墊保護套; 表演賽; 治療型; 西部; 其他
bg-BG: Стил на подложката за седло: Универсална; За езда без седло; Барел рейсинг; Коригираща; Обездижане; Издръжливост; За коне с ход (Gaited); Половин подложка; Прескачане на препятствия / близък контакт; Поло; Одеяло за седло; Предпазител за седалка; Шоу; Терапевтичен; Уестърн; Друго
vi: Kiểu đệm yên ngựa: Đa năng; Cưỡi ngựa không yên; Đua ngựa quanh thùng; Điều chỉnh tư thế; Biểu diễn; Sức bền; Ngựa đi nước kiệu; Đệm nửa; Nhảy / tiếp xúc gần; Mã cầu; Chăn lót yên; Lót bảo vệ yên; Biểu diễn; Trị liệu; Kiểu miền Tây; Khác
sl-SI: Stil podsedelnice: Večnamenska; Za jahanje brez sedla; Barrel racing; Korekcijska; Dresurna; Vzdržljivostna; Za konje s posebnimi hodi; Polovična podsedelnica; Preskakovanje zaprek / tesen stik; Polo; Odeja za sedlo; Zaščita za sedež; Za nastope; Terapevtsko; Western; Drugo
hu: Nyereg párnázás típusa: Univerzális; Bareback; Hordókerülés; Korrekciós; Díjlovagló; Távlovagló; Speciális járómódú lónak; Félalátét; Díjugrató / close contact; Lovaspóló; Nyeregtakaró; Ülésvédő; Show; Terápiás; Western; Egyéb
cs: Styl sedlové podložky: Všestranné; Jezdecký pad; Barrel racing; Korekční; Drezurní; Vytrvalostní; Pro mimochodníky; Tlumicí dečka; Skokové / close contact; Polo; Westernová deka; Potah na posedlí; Výstavní; Terapeutické; Westernové; Jiné
de: Art der Sattelpolsterung: Vielseitigkeit; Bareback; Barrel Racing; Korrektur; Dressur; Endurance; Gangpferd; Halfpad; Springen / Close Contact; Polo; Satteldecke; Sitzschoner; Show; Therapeutisch; Western; Sonstige
it: Stile del sottosella: Multiuso; A pelo; Barrel racing; Da correzione; Dressage; Endurance; Cavallo a passo; Mezzo pad; Salto ostacoli / close contact; Polo; Coperta sottosella; Coprisella imbottito; Show; Terapeutico; Western; Altro
ru: Стиль вальтрапа: Универсальный; Для езды без седла; Для баррел-рейсинга; Корректирующий; Выездковый; Для пробегов; Для аллюрных лошадей; Амортизатор; Конкурный / для плотного контакта; Для поло; Седельное одеяло; Чехол на сиденье; Шоу; Терапевтический; Вестерн; Другое
sk-SK: Štýl postrovania jazdeckého sedla: Všestranná; Bez sedla (bareback); Barrel racing; Korekčná; Drezúrna; Vytrvalostná; Pre mimochodníky; Polovičná; Skoková / Close contact; Pólo; Sedlová deka; Chránič posedlia; Výstavné; Terapeutické; Westernové; Iné
ko: 새들 패드 스타일: 다목적; 베어백; 배럴 레이싱; 교정용; 마장마술; 지구력; 게이티드 홀스; 하프 패드; 점프 / 클로즈 콘택트; 폴로; 새들 블랭킷; 시트 세이버; 쇼; 치료용; 웨스턴; 기타
ro-RO: Stil de valtrap: Uz general; Fără șa (Bareback); Barrel racing; De corecție; Dresaj; Anduranță; Cal cu aluri specifice (Gaited); Semi-pad; Sărituri / close contact; Polo; Pătură pentru șa; Husă de protecție pentru șezut; Expoziție; Terapeutic; Western; Altele
th: รูปแบบแผ่นรองอาน: อเนกประสงค์; แบร์แบ็ก; แบร์เรลเรซซิ่ง; คอร์เรกชัน; ศิลปะการบังคับม้า; เอ็นดูแรนซ์; สำหรับม้าเรียงเท้า; ฮาล์ฟแพด; กระโดด/โคลสคอนแทค; โปโล; ผ้าห่มรองอาน; แผ่นรองนั่ง; สำหรับโชว์; เพื่อการบำบัด; เวสเทิร์น; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Stil podloge za sedlo: Višenamjenski; Za jahanje bez sedla; Za utrke oko bačvi; Korekcijski; Dresurni; Za daljinsko jahanje; Za konje s posebnim hodovima; Polovična podloga; Preponski / bliski kontakt; Za polo; Pokrivač za sedlo; Navlaka za sjedalo; Za natjecanja; Terapeutski; Western; Ostalo
fr: Style de tapis de selle: Mixte; Monte à cru; Barrel racing; Correcteur; Dressage; Endurance; Cheval d’allures; Amortisseur; Obstacle / Close contact; Polo; Couverture de selle; Dessus de selle; Compétition; Thérapeutique; Western; Autre
nb: Polstringstype for sete: Allround; Barbak; Barrel racing; Korreksjon; Dressur; Distanse; Gangartshest; Halvpad; Sprang / close contact; Polo; Sadelteppe; Setebeskytter; Show; Terapeutisk; Western; Annet
lt-LT: Balno paminkštinimo stilius: Universalus; Jojimui be balno; Statinės jodinėjimo varžyboms; Korekcinis; Išjodinėjimo; Ištvermės jojimo; Specialaus aliūro žirgams; Pusinis pobalnis; Konkūrinis / artimo kontakto; Polo; Balno gūnia; Sėdynės apsauga; Parodoms; Terapinis; Vesternietiškas; Kita
nl: Zadeldekstijl: Veelzijdigheid; Bareback; Barrelracing; Correctie; Dressuur; Endurance; Gangenpaard; Half-pad; Springen / close contact; Polo; Zadeldeken; Zadelbeschermer; Show; Therapeutisch; Western; Overige
pt-BR: Sela, estilo da manta: Uso geral; Pelo; Três tambores; Correção; Adestramento; Enduro; Cavalo de marcha; Meia manta; Salto / contato direto; Polo; Baixeiro; Protetor de assento; Competição; Terapêutico; Western; Outros
es: Estilo de manta de montar: Uso general; Monta a pelo; Carrera de barriles; Corrector; Doma clásica; Resistencia; Caballo de paso; Salvacruz; Salto/contacto estrecho; Polo; Manta para silla de montar; Protector de asiento; Exhibición; Terapéutico; Western; Otro
da: Sadelunderlagsstil: Kombineret; Barbak; Barrel racing; Korrektion; Dressur; Distance; Gangartshest; Halfpad; Spring/close contact; Polo; Sadeltæppe; Sædebeskytter; Show; Terapeutisk; Western; Andet
en: Saddle pad style: All purpose; Bareback; Barrel racing; Correction; Dressage; Endurance; Gaited horse; Half pad; Jump / close contact; Polo; Saddle blanket; Seat saver; Show; Therapeutic; Western; Other
sv: Modell av sadelunderlägg: Allround; Barbacka; Barrel racing; Korrektion; Dressyr; Distans; Gångartshäst; Halvpad; Hopp/close contact; Polo; Sadelfilt; Sitsöverdrag; Show; Terapeutisk; Western; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de almofada de sela: Uso geral; Monta em pelo; Corrida de barris; Correção; Dressage; Resistência; Cavalo de andamento; Meia almofada; Salto / contacto próximo; Polo; Manta de sela; Protetor de assento; Exibição; Terapêutico; Western; Outro
ja: サドルパッドスタイル: 総合用; ベアバック; バレルレーシング; 補正用; 馬場馬術; エンデュランス; ゲイテッドホース; ハーフパッド; 障害飛越 / クロースコンタクト; ポロ; サドルブランケット; シートセーバー; ショー用; セラピューティック; ウェスタン; その他
pl: Styl podkładki pod siodło: Wszechstronny; Do jazdy na oklep; Barrel racing; Korekcyjny; Ujeżdżeniowy; Endurance; Dla koni inochodzących; Półpad; Skokowy / Close contact; Polo; Koc pod siodło; Nakładka na siedzisko; Pokazowy; Terapeutyczny; Western; Inny
el: Στυλ υποστρώματος σέλας: Γενικής χρήσης; Χωρίς σέλα (Bareback); Αγώνες με βαρέλια (Barrel racing); Διόρθωσης; Ιππικής δεξιοτεχνίας (Dressage); Αντοχής; Αλόγων με βηματισμό (Gaited); Μισό επίθημα; Άλματος / στενής επαφής; Πόλο; Κουβέρτα σέλας; Προστατευτικό σέλας; Επίδειξης; Θεραπευτικό; Γουέστερν; Άλλο
tr: Sele pedi stili: Çok amaçlı; Eyersiz; Varil yarışı; Düzeltici; Dresaj; Dayanıklılık; Rahvan at; Yarım ped; Engel atlama/yakın temas; Polo; Sele battaniyesi; Sele koruyucu; Gösteri; Terapötik; Western; Diğer
zh-CN: 马鞍垫样式: 综合型; 裸背; 绕桶赛; 矫正型; 盛装舞步; 耐力赛; 步态马; 半垫; 障碍赛 / 紧密接触; 马球; 鞍毯; 座垫保护套; 表演; 治疗型; 西部型; 其他